California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) Notify persons and entities who appear to be clients of the attorney of the occurrence of the event or events stated in Section 6180 and inform them that it may be to their best interest to obtain other legal counsel.

(c) Apply for an extension of time pending employment of such other counsel by the client.

(d) With the consent of the client, file notices, motions and pleadings on behalf of the client where
 jurisdictional time limits are involved and other legal counsel has not yet been obtained.

(e) Give notice to the depositor and appropriate persons and entities who may be affected, other than clients, of the occurrence of such event or events.

(f) Arrange for the surrender or delivery of clients’ papers or property.

(g) Arrange for the appointment of a receiver, where applicable, to take possession and control of any and all bank accounts relating to the affected attorney’s practice of law, including the general or office account and the clients’ trust account.

(h) Do such other acts as the court may direct to carry out the purposes of this article.

The court shall have jurisdiction over the files and records
 and law practice of the affected attorney for the limited purposes of this section, and may make all orders necessary or appropriate to exercise this jurisdiction. The court shall provide a copy of any order issued pursuant to this article to the Office of the Chief Trial Counsel of the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 130.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.6.

Nothing in this article shall authorize the court or an attorney appointed by it pursuant to this article to approve or disapprove of the employment of legal counsel, fix terms of legal employment, fix the compensation which may have been earned by the affected attorney, or supervise or in any way to undertake to conduct the law practice except to the limited extent provided by subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 6180.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 156, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.7.

Unless court approval is first obtained, neither the attorney appointed pursuant to this article nor his corporation nor any partners or associates of the attorney shall accept employment as an attorney by any client of the affected attorney on any matter pending at the time of the appointment. Action taken pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 6180.5 shall not be deemed such employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 156, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.8.

Upon a finding by the court that it is more likely than not that the application will be granted and that delay in making the orders described in Section 6180.5 will result in substantial injury to clients, or to others, the court, without notice or upon such notice as it shall prescribe, may make interim orders containing such provisions as the court deems appropriate under the circumstances. Such order shall be served in the manner provided in Section 6180.4, and if the application and order to show cause have not yet been served, they shall be served at the time of serving the order made pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 589.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.9.

If there is a pending proceeding in probate, guardianship, or conservatorship relating to the affected attorney, the court having jurisdiction pursuant to this article may inquire into acts done by the legal representative of the attorney concerning the law practice. Upon reasonable notice to the legal representative, the court may determine that the acts of the legal representative relating to such law practice shall be subject to its orders pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 589.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.10.

Persons examining the files and records of the law practice of the affected attorney pursuant to this article shall observe the lawyer-client privilege and shall make disclosure only to the extent necessary to carry out the purposes of this article. Such disclosure is a disclosure which is reasonably necessary for the accomplishment of the purpose for which the affected attorney was consulted. The appointment of such licensee of the State Bar shall not affect the lawyer-client privilege which privilege shall apply to communications by or to the appointed lawyers to the same extent as it would have applied to communications by or to the affected attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 131.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.11.

No person or entity shall incur any liability by reason of the institution or maintenance of the proceeding. No person shall incur any liability for any act done or omitted to be done pursuant to order of the court under this article. No person or entity shall be liable for failure to apply for court jurisdiction under this article. Nothing in this section shall affect any obligation otherwise existing between the affected attorney and any other person or entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 453, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.12.

A licensee of the State Bar appointed pursuant to Section 6180.5 shall serve without compensation. However, the licensee may be paid reasonable compensation by the State Bar in cases where the State Bar has determined that the licensee has devoted extraordinary time and services which were necessary to the performance of the licensee’s duties under this article. All payments of compensation for time and services shall be at the discretion of the State Bar. Any licensee shall be entitled to reimbursement from the State Bar for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the licensee’s duties under this article. Upon court approval of expenses or compensation for time and services, the State Bar shall be entitled to reimbursement therefor from the affected attorney or his or her
 estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 132.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.13.

An order made pursuant to this article is nonappealable, and shall not be stayed by petition for a writ except as ordered by the superior court or the appellate court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 589.)
-------------------------------------------

6180.14.

As used in this article, “attorney” means a licensee or former licensee of the State Bar; “law practice” means (a) a law practice conducted by an individual; (b) a law practice conducted by a partnership, if Section 6180 applies to all partners; and (c) a law practice conducted by a law corporation, if Section 6180 applies to all shareholders of the corporation or if the corporation is described in subdivision (b) of Section 13406 of the Corporations Code. This article does not apply to legal services rendered as an employee, or under a contract which does not create the relationship of lawyer and client.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 133.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6185.

(a) Upon appointment by the superior court pursuant to Section 2468, 9764, or paragraph (22) or (23) of subdivision (b) of Section 17200 of the Probate Code, a practice administrator, who is an active licensee of the State Bar, may be granted, by order of the court appointing this person, one or more of the following powers to take control of the practice of a deceased or disabled licensee of the State Bar of California:

(1) Take control of all operating and client trust accounts, business assets, equipment, client directories, and premises that were used in the conduct of the deceased or disabled licensee’s practice.

(2) Take control and review all client files
 of the deceased or disabled licensee.

(3) Contact each client of the deceased or disabled licensee who can be reasonably ascertained and located to inform the client of the condition of the licensee and of the appointment of a practice administrator. The practice administrator may discuss various options for the selection of successor counsel with the client.

(4) In each case that is pending before any court or administrative body, notify the appropriate court or administrative body and contact opposing counsel in the cases under the control of the deceased or disabled licensee and obtain additional time for new counsel to appear for the affected client.

(5) Determine the liabilities of the practice and pay them for the assets of the practice. If the assets of the practice are insufficient to pay these obligations or
 for the expenses incurred by the practice administrator to carry out the powers ordered pursuant to this section, the practice administrator shall apply to the personal representative to obtain the additional funds that may be required. If the personal representative and the practice administrator are unable to agree on the amount that is necessary for the practice administrator to undertake the duties ordered pursuant to this paragraph, either party may apply to the court having jurisdiction over the estate of the deceased or disabled licensee for an order requesting funds from the estate.

(6) Employ any person, including but not limited to the employees of the deceased or disabled licensee, who may be necessary to assist the practice administrator in the management, winding up, and disposal of the practice.

(7) Create a plan for disposition of the practice of the deceased or
 disabled licensee to protect its value as an asset of the estate of the licensee. Subject to the approval of the personal representative of the estate, agree to the sale of the practice and its goodwill.

(8) Subject to the approval of the personal representative of the estate, reach agreements with successor counsel for division of fees for work in process on the cases of the deceased or disabled licensee.

(9) Subject to the prohibitions against soliciting cases, the practice administrator may act as successor counsel for a client of the deceased or disabled licensee.

(b) If the practice administrator is uncertain as to how to proceed with the powers granted pursuant to this section, he or she may apply to the Superior Court that has jurisdiction over the estate of the deceased or disabled licensee for
 instructions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 134.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Incapacity to Attend to Law Practice—Jurisdiction of Courts [6190. - 6190.6.]

6190.

The courts of the state shall have the jurisdiction as provided in this article when an attorney engaged in the practice of law in this state has, for any reason, including but not limited to excessive use of alcohol or drugs, physical or mental illness, or other infirmity or other cause, become incapable of devoting the time and attention to, and providing the quality of service for, his or her law practice which is necessary to protect the interest of a client if there is an unfinished client matter for which no other active licensee of the State Bar, with the consent of the client, has agreed to assume responsibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 135.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6190.1.

(a) An application for assumption by the court of jurisdiction under this article shall be made to the superior court for the county where the attorney maintains or most recently has maintained his or her principal office for the practice of law or where such attorney resides. The court may assume jurisdiction over the law practice of an attorney to the extent provided in Article 11 (commencing with Section 6180) of Chapter 4 of Division 3.

(b) Where an attorney consents to the assumption by the court of jurisdiction under the article, the State Bar, a client, or an interested person or entity may apply to the court for assumption of jurisdiction over the law practice of the attorney. In any proceeding under this subdivision, the State Bar shall be permitted to
 intervene and to assume primary responsibility for conducting the action.

(c) Where an attorney does not consent to the assumption by the court of jurisdiction under this article, only the State Bar may apply to the court for assumption of jurisdiction over the law practice of the attorney.

(d) The chief trial counsel may appoint, pursuant to rules adopted by the board of trustees, an examiner or coexaminer from among the licensees of the State Bar in an investigation or formal proceeding under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 136.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6190.2.

The application shall be verified and shall state facts showing each of the following:

(a) Probable cause to believe that the facts set forth in Section 6190 have occurred.

(b) The interest of the applicant.

(c) Probable cause to believe that the interests of the client or of an interested person or entity will be prejudiced if the proceeding herein provided is not maintained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 582, Sec. 6.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

6190.3.

The application shall be set for hearing. A copy of the application and notice of the hearing shall be served upon the attorney by personal delivery or, as an alternate method of service, by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the attorney at the latest address shown on the official licensing records of the State Bar. Service is complete at the time of mailing, but any prescribed period of notice and any right or duty to do any act or make any response within that prescribed period or on a date certain after notice is served by mail shall be extended five days if the place of address is within the State of California, 10 days if the place of address is outside the State of California but within the United States, and 20 days if the place of address is outside the United States.
 If the attorney has a guardian or conservator, copies shall also be served upon such fiduciary in similar manner. If the State Bar is not an applicant, copies shall also be served upon the Office of the Chief Trial Counsel of the State Bar in similar manner at the time of service on the attorney. The court may prescribe additional or alternative methods of service of the application and notice, and may prescribe methods of notifying and serving notices and process upon other persons and entities in cases not specifically provided for herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 137.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6190.34.

If the court finds that (a) the facts set forth in Section 6190 have occurred and, (b) that the interests of the client, or of an interested person or entity will be prejudiced if the proceeding provided herein is not maintained, the court shall order the applicant to mail a notice of cessation of law practice pursuant to Section 6180.1 and may make all orders provided for by the provisions of Article 11 (commencing with Section 6180) of Chapter 4 of Division 3. The court shall provide a copy of any order issued pursuant to this article to the Office of the Chief Trial Counsel of the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 156, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6190.4.

The provisions of Article 11 (commencing with Section 6180) of Chapter 4 of Division 3 of this code shall apply to the proceeding, whenever possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 387.)
-------------------------------------------

6190.5.

The proceeding may be maintained concurrently with a disciplinary investigation or proceeding provided for by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 387.)
-------------------------------------------

6190.6.

Upon motion duly made by any interested party, the court may terminate the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 387.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Arbitration of Attorney’s Fees [6200. - 6206.]

6200.

(a) The board of trustees shall, by rule, establish, maintain, and administer a system and procedure for the arbitration, and may establish, maintain, and administer a system and procedure for mediation of disputes concerning fees, costs, or both, charged for professional services by licensees of the State Bar or by members of the bar of other jurisdictions. The rules may include provision for a filing fee in the amount as the board may, from time to time, determine.

(b) This article shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Disputes where a licensee of the State Bar of California is also admitted to practice in another
 jurisdiction or where an attorney is only admitted to practice in another jurisdiction, and the attorney maintains no office in the State of California, and no material portion of the services were rendered in the State of California.

(2) Claims for affirmative relief against the attorney for damages or otherwise based upon alleged malpractice or professional misconduct, except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 6203.

(3) Disputes where the fee or cost to be paid by the client or on the client’s behalf has been determined pursuant to statute or court order.

(c) Unless the client has agreed in writing to arbitration under this article of all disputes concerning fees, costs, or both, arbitration under this
 article shall be voluntary for a client and shall be mandatory for an attorney if commenced by a client. Mediation under this article shall be voluntary for an attorney and a client.

(d) The board of trustees shall adopt rules to allow arbitration and mediation of attorney fee and cost disputes under this article to proceed under arbitration and mediation systems sponsored by local bar associations in this state. Rules of procedure promulgated by local bar associations are subject to review by the board or a committee designated by the board to ensure that they provide for a fair, impartial, and speedy hearing and award.

(e) In adopting or reviewing rules of arbitration under this section, the board shall provide that the panel shall include one attorney member whose area of practice is
 either, at the option of the client, civil law, if the attorney’s representation involved civil law, or criminal law, if the attorney’s representation involved criminal law, as follows:

(1) If the panel is composed of three members the panel shall include one attorney member whose area of practice is either, at the option of the client, civil or criminal law, and shall include one lay member.

(2) If the panel is composed of one member, that member shall be an attorney whose area of practice is either, at the option of the client, civil or criminal law.

(f) In any arbitration or mediation conducted pursuant to this article by the State Bar or by a local bar association, pursuant to rules of procedure approved by the
 board of trustees, an arbitrator or mediator, as well as the arbitrating association and its directors, officers, and employees, shall have the same immunity that attaches in judicial proceedings.

(g) In the conduct of arbitrations under this article the arbitrator or arbitrators may do all of the following:

(1) Take and hear evidence pertaining to the proceeding.

(2) Administer oaths and affirmations.

(3) Issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, and documents pertaining to the proceeding.

(h) Participation in mediation is a voluntary consensual process, based
 on direct negotiations between the attorney and client, and is an extension of the negotiated settlement process. All discussions and offers of settlement are confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to any state law, including, but not limited to, the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), and may not be disclosed in any subsequent arbitration or other proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 21.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.

(a) The rules adopted by the board of trustees shall provide that an attorney shall forward a written notice to the client prior to or at the time of service of summons or claim in an action against the client, or prior to or at the commencement of any other proceeding against the client under a contract between attorney and client which provides for an alternative to arbitration under this article, for recovery of fees, costs, or both. The written notice shall be in the form that the board of trustees prescribes, and shall include a statement of the client’s right to arbitration under this article. Failure to give this notice shall be a ground for the dismissal of the action or other proceeding. The notice shall not be required, however, prior to
 initiating mediation of the dispute.

The rules adopted by the board of trustees shall provide that the client’s failure to request arbitration within 30 days after receipt of notice from the attorney shall be deemed a waiver of the client’s right to arbitration under the provisions of this article.

(b) If an attorney, or the attorney’s assignee, commences an action in any court or any other proceeding and the client is entitled to maintain arbitration under this article, and the dispute is not one to which subdivision (b) of Section 6200 applies, the client may stay the action or other proceeding by serving and filing a request for arbitration in accordance with the rules established by the board of trustees pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 6200. The request for arbitration shall be served and filed prior to the filing of an answer in the action or equivalent response in the other proceeding;
 failure to so request arbitration prior to the filing of an answer or equivalent response shall be deemed a waiver of the client’s right to arbitration under the provisions of this article if notice of the client’s right to arbitration was given pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Upon filing and service of the request for arbitration, the action or other proceeding shall be automatically stayed until the award of the arbitrators is issued or the arbitration is otherwise terminated. The stay may be vacated in whole or in part, after a hearing duly noticed by any party or the court, if and to the extent the court finds that the matter is not appropriate for arbitration under the provisions of this article. The action or other proceeding may thereafter proceed subject to the provisions of Section 6204.

(d) A client’s right to request or maintain arbitration under the provisions of this
 article is waived by the client commencing an action or filing any pleading seeking either of the following:

(1) Judicial resolution of a fee dispute to which this article applies.

(2) Affirmative relief against the attorney for damages or otherwise based upon alleged malpractice or professional misconduct.

(e) If the client waives the right to arbitration under this article, the parties may stipulate to set aside the waiver and to proceed with arbitration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 417, Sec. 56.   (SB 163)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6202.

The provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code shall not prohibit the disclosure of any relevant communication, nor shall the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 2018.010) of Title 4 of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure be construed to prohibit the disclosure of any relevant work product of the attorney in connection with: (a) an arbitration hearing or mediation pursuant to this article; (b) a trial after arbitration; or (c) judicial confirmation, correction, or vacation of an arbitration award. In no event shall such disclosure be deemed a waiver of the confidential character of such matters for any other purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.

(a) The award shall be in writing and signed by the arbitrators concurring therein. It shall include a determination of all the questions submitted to the arbitrators, the decision of which is necessary in order to determine the controversy. The award shall not include any award to either party for costs or attorney’s fees incurred in preparation for or in the course of the fee arbitration proceeding, notwithstanding any contract between the parties providing for such an award or costs or attorney’s fees. However, the filing fee paid may be allocated between the parties by the arbitrators. This section shall not preclude an award of costs or attorney’s fees to either party by a court pursuant to subdivision (c) of this section or of subdivision (d) of Section 6204. The State Bar, or the local bar association delegated by the State
 Bar to conduct the arbitration, shall deliver to each of the parties with the award, an original declaration of service of the award.

Evidence relating to claims of malpractice and professional misconduct, shall be admissible only to the extent that those claims bear upon the fees, costs, or both, to which the attorney is entitled. The arbitrators shall not award affirmative relief, in the form of damages or offset or otherwise, for injuries underlying the claim. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the arbitrators from awarding the client a refund of unearned fees, costs, or both previously paid to the attorney.

(b) Even if the parties to the arbitration have not agreed in writing to be bound, the arbitration award shall become binding upon the passage of 30 days after service of notice of the award, unless a party has, within the 30 days, sought a trial after arbitration pursuant to
 Section 6204. If an action has previously been filed in any court, any petition to confirm, correct, or vacate the award shall be to the court in which the action is pending, and may be served by mail on any party who has appeared, as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1003) of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure; otherwise it shall be in the same manner as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1285) of Title 9 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. If no action is pending in any court, the award may be confirmed, corrected, or vacated by petition to the court having jurisdiction over the amount of the arbitration award, but otherwise in the same manner as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1285) of Title 9 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) Neither party to the arbitration may recover costs or attorney’s fees incurred in preparation for or in the course of the fee arbitration
 proceeding with the exception of the filing fee paid pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section. However, a court confirming, correcting, or vacating an award under this section may award to the prevailing party reasonable fees and costs incurred in obtaining confirmation, correction, or vacation of the award including, if applicable, fees and costs on appeal. The party obtaining judgment confirming, correcting, or vacating the award shall be the prevailing party except that, without regard to consideration of who the prevailing party may be, if a party did not appear at the arbitration hearing in the manner provided by the rules adopted by the board of trustees, that party shall not be entitled to attorney’s fees or costs upon confirmation, correction, or vacation of the award.

(d) (1) In any matter arbitrated under this article in which the award is binding or has become binding by operation of law or has become a
 judgment either after confirmation under subdivision (c) or after a trial after arbitration under Section 6204, or in any matter mediated under this article, if: (A) the award, judgment, or agreement reached after mediation includes a refund of fees or costs, or both, to the client and (B) the attorney has not complied with that award, judgment, or agreement the State Bar shall enforce the award, judgment, or agreement by placing the attorney on involuntary inactive status until the refund has been paid.

(2) The State Bar shall provide for an administrative procedure to determine whether an award, judgment, or agreement should be enforced pursuant to this subdivision. An award, judgment, or agreement shall be so enforced if:

(A) The State Bar shows that the attorney has failed to comply with a binding fee arbitration award, judgment, or agreement rendered pursuant to this
 article.

(B) The attorney has not proposed a payment plan acceptable to the client or the State Bar.

However, the award, judgment, or agreement shall not be so enforced if the attorney has demonstrated that he or she (i) is not personally responsible for making or ensuring payment of the refund, or (ii) is unable to pay the refund.

(3) An attorney who has failed to comply with a binding award, judgment, or agreement shall pay administrative penalties or reasonable costs, or both, as directed by the State Bar. Penalties imposed shall not exceed 20 percent of the amount to be refunded to the client or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is greater. Any penalties or costs, or both, that are not paid shall be added to the license fee of the attorney for the next calendar year.

(4) The board shall terminate the inactive enrollment upon proof that the attorney has complied with the award, judgment, or agreement and upon payment of any costs or penalties, or both, assessed as a result of the attorney’s failure to comply.

(5) A request for enforcement under this subdivision shall be made within four years from the date (A) the arbitration award was mailed, (B) the judgment was entered, or (C) the date the agreement was signed. In an arbitrated matter, however, in no event shall a request be made prior to 100 days from the date of the service of a signed copy of the award. In cases where the award is appealed, a request shall not be made prior to 100 days from the date the award has become final as set forth in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 139.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6204.

(a) The parties may agree in writing to be bound by the award of arbitrators appointed pursuant to this article at any time after the dispute over fees, costs, or both, has arisen. In the absence of such an agreement, either party shall be entitled to a trial after arbitration if sought within 30 days, pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), except that if either party willfully fails to appear at the arbitration hearing in the manner provided by the rules adopted by the board of trustees, that party shall not be entitled to a trial after arbitration. The determination of willfulness shall be made by the court. The party who failed to appear at the arbitration shall have the burden of proving that the failure to appear was not willful. In making its determination, the court may consider any
 findings made by the arbitrators on the subject of a party’s failure to appear.

(b) If there is an action pending, the trial after arbitration shall be initiated by filing a rejection of arbitration award and request for trial after arbitration in that action within 30 days after service of notice of the award. If the rejection of arbitration award has been filed by the plaintiff in the pending action, all defendants shall file a responsive pleading within 30 days following service upon the defendant of the rejection of arbitration award and request for trial after arbitration. If the rejection of arbitration award has been filed by the defendant in the pending action, all defendants shall file a responsive pleading within 30 days after the filing of the rejection of arbitration award and request for trial after arbitration. Service may be made by mail on any party who has appeared; otherwise service shall be made in the manner provided in
 Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Upon service and filing of the rejection of arbitration award, any stay entered pursuant to Section 6201 shall be vacated, without the necessity of a court order.

(c) If no action is pending, the trial after arbitration shall be initiated by the commencement of an action in the court having jurisdiction over the amount of money in controversy within 30 days after service of notice of the award. After the filing of such an action, the action shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 307) of the Code of Civil Procedure, concerning civil actions generally.

(d) The party seeking a trial after arbitration shall be the prevailing party if that party obtains a judgment more favorable than that provided by the arbitration award, and in all other cases
 the other party shall be the prevailing party. The prevailing party may, in the discretion of the court, be entitled to an allowance for reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred in the trial after arbitration, which allowance shall be fixed by the court. In fixing the attorney’s fees, the court shall consider the award and determinations of the arbitrators, in addition to any other relevant evidence.

(e) Except as provided in this section, the award and determinations of the arbitrators shall not be admissible nor operate as collateral estoppel or res judicata in any action or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 417, Sec. 58.   (SB 163)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6204.5.

(a) The State Bar shall provide by rule for an appropriate procedure to disqualify an arbitrator or mediator upon request of either party.

(b) The State Bar, or the local bar association delegated by the State Bar to conduct the arbitration, shall deliver a notice to the parties advising them of their rights to judicial relief subsequent to the arbitration proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1104, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6206.

The time for filing a civil action seeking judicial resolution of a dispute subject to arbitration under this article shall be tolled from the time an arbitration is initiated in accordance with the rules adopted by the board of trustees until (a) 30 days after receipt of notice of the award of the arbitrators, or (b) receipt of notice that the arbitration is otherwise terminated, whichever comes first. Arbitration shall not be commenced under this article if a civil action requesting the same relief would be barred by Title 2 (commencing with Section 312) of
 Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure; provided that this limitation shall not apply to a request for arbitration by a client, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6201, following the commencement of an action in any court or any other proceeding by the attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   (AB 692)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Funds for the Provision of Legal Services to Indigent Persons [6210. - 6228.]

6210.

The Legislature finds that, due to insufficient funding, existing programs providing free legal services in civil matters to indigent persons, especially underserved client groups, such as the elderly, the disabled, juveniles, and non-English-speaking persons, do not adequately meet the needs of these persons. It is the purpose of this article to expand the availability and improve the quality of existing free legal services in civil matters to indigent persons, and to initiate new programs that will provide services to them. The Legislature finds that the use of funds collected by the State Bar pursuant to this article for these purposes is in the public interest, is a proper use of the funds, and is consistent with essential public and governmental purposes in the judicial branch of government. The Legislature further finds that the expansion, improvement, and initiation of legal services to indigent persons will aid in the advancement of the science of jurisprudence and the improvement of the administration of justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.5.

(a) There shall be created, within the State Bar, a Legal Services Trust Fund Commission to administer IOLTA accounts, Equal Access Funds, or similar funds or grant moneys intended for the support of qualified legal services projects and qualified support centers, as those terms are defined in Section 6213.

(b) (1) The Legal Services Trust Fund Commission shall be comprised of 24 commissioners as follows:

(A) Six commissioners shall be appointed by the State Bar Board of Trustees.

(B) Two commissioners shall be appointed by the Senate Committee
 on Rules.

(C) Two commissioners shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(D) Ten commissioners shall be appointed by the Chair of the Judicial Council, of which three shall be nonvoting judicial advisors. The three nonvoting judicial advisors shall be comprised of two superior court judges and one appellate justice.

(E) Four commissioners shall be appointed by the Legal Services Trust Fund Commission, of which at least two shall be, or have been within five years of appointment, indigent persons as defined by Section 6213.

(2) No employee or independent contractor acting as a consultant to a potential recipient of Legal Services Trust Fund grants
 shall be appointed to the Legal Services Trust Fund Commission. All commissioners shall be designated employees under the Conflict of Interest Code of the State Bar.

(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4), each commissioner shall serve for a term of four years that begins upon appointment. Upon completion of an initial term, a commissioner may be reappointed for a second four-year term. An initial or second term may be extended by one or two years, for a maximum of 10 years, to allow a commissioner to serve as chair or vice chair. A commissioner currently serving as of January 1, 2022, may be reappointed to two additional full terms following the completion of their current term pursuant to paragraph (5).

(4) A commissioner appointed by the chair of the Judicial Council
 shall have no term limits.

(5) Each commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing entity. Each appointing entity may stagger their appointments so one-half of the commissioners are appointed in 2022 and the other one-half are appointed in 2023. A commissioner serving as of January 1, 2022, may continue to serve until replaced by the appointing entity or January 1, 2024, whichever occurs first.

(6) Commissioners who are not currently and have never been attorneys licensed in California or another jurisdiction and who submit a form designated by the commission to request a per diem shall be entitled to receive fifty dollars ($50) per day for each day that they attend a commission meeting of at least one hour in length.
